Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Turnpike Projects
177.540.
Refunding bonds — Additional bonds.

The department is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance of turnpike revenue refunding bonds of the Commonwealth for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds, and, if the department shall so determine, for the additional purpose of constructing improvements, extensions, or enlargements of the turnpike project or projects in connection with which the bonds to be refunded shall have been issued. The department is further authorized to provide for the issuance of its turnpike revenue bonds for the combined purpose of (a) refunding any bonds then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds and (b) paying all or any part of the cost of any additional turnpike project or projects. The issuance of such bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties and obligations of the department in respect of the same, shall be governed by the provisions of KRS 177.390 to 177.570 insofar as the same may be applicable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 157, § 16.

177.550.
Transfer of turnpike to highway system after retirement of bonds.

Except as hereinafter provided in this section, when all bonds issued under KRS

177.390

to

177.570

in connection with any turnpike project or projects and the interest thereon shall have been paid or a sufficient amount for the payment of all such bonds and the interest thereon to the maturity thereof shall have been set aside in trust for the benefit of the bondholders, such project or projects, if then in good condition and repair, shall become part of the state highway system and shall thereafter be maintained by the department free of tolls; provided, however, the department may, in any proceedings or trust agreement authorizing or securing bonds under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

, provide for combining for financing purposes any two (2) or more turnpike projects theretofore constructed or thereafter to be constructed, and for the reimposition or continuance of tolls on each such turnpike project until all such bonds and the interest thereon shall have been paid or a sufficient amount for such purposes shall have been set aside in trust for the benefit of the bondholders.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 157, § 17; 1960, ch. 174, § 10.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Under the specific authority of this section, the Department of Highways may issue additional turnpike revenue bonds to finance the construction of the remaining portions of the Kentucky Turnpike. If such bonds are issued to finance such construction, the tolls on the Louisville to Elizabethtown section may be reimposed or continued.

OAG 70-823

.

177.560.
Preliminary expenses of turnpike project.

The department is hereby authorized in its discretion to expend such moneys as may be necessary for the study of any turnpike project or projects and to use its engineering and other forces and employ consulting engineers and traffic engineers for the purpose of effecting such study, and to pay for such additional engineering and traffic and other expert studies as it may deem expedient. All such expenses incurred by the department prior to the issuance of turnpike revenue bonds under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.570

shall be paid by the department and charged to the appropriate turnpike project or projects, and the department shall keep proper records and accounts showing each amount so charged. Upon the sale of turnpike revenue bonds for any turnpike project or projects, the funds so expended by the department in connection with such project or projects may be reimbursed to the department from the proceeds of such bonds if provision to that effect is made in the proceedings or trust agreement under which such bonds are issued.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 157, § 18; 1960, ch. 174, § 11.

177.570.
Turnpike law is alternative.

KRS

177.390

to

177.560

shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby, and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, and shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing; provided, however, that the issuance of turnpike revenue bonds or turnpike revenue refunding bonds under the provisions of KRS

177.390

to

177.560

need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 157, § 19.